Massachusetts, session 194th, H530.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 1T the following section:-
Section 1U. (a) Drug, alcohol and tobacco use education standards established pursuant
to section 1D shall promote an understanding of opioid use disorder including, but not limited to:
(i) opioids, opiates and how substance use disorder occurs; (ii) procedures to identify an opioid
overdose; (iii) naloxone, where to find it and how to use it to reverse an opioid overdose; (iv)
destigmatizing naloxone possession; and (v) existing statewide medical amnesty for lay people
who administer naloxone or contact emergency services in the event of a suspected overdose.
(b) A school district, charter school, approved private day or residential school or
collaborative school shall incorporate the opioid use disorder education standards established
pursuant to section 1D and subsection (a) into existing curriculum including, but not limited to,
health education.
of 2

(c) The department may apply for federal, state or other funding to implement this
section.
of 2